apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="spel/l__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>            <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>            <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ls</l>           <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>          <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>          <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>          <r>eik<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/ik__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>           <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>           <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iks</l>          <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>           <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>         <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkin</l>        <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkin</l>        <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkin</l>        <r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/ikk__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ikk</l>          <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikk</l>          <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikks</l>         <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akk</l>          <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>         <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkin</l>        <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkin</l>        <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkin</l>        <r>ikk<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="spit__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tit</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tit</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/aun__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aun</l>          <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aun</l>          <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>auns</l>         <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uid</l>          <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uiden</l>        <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aunin</l>        <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aunin</l>        <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aunin</l>        <r>aun<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/aund__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aund</l>          <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aund</l>          <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aunds</l>         <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uid</l>           <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uiden</l>         <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aundin</l>        <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aundin</l>        <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aundin</l>        <r>aund<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/ak__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>            <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>            <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aks</l>           <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>euk</l>           <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aen</l>           <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akkin</l>         <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akkin</l>         <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akkin</l>         <r>ak<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>           <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>           <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ook</l>           <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aken</l>          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akin</l>          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akin</l>          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akin</l>          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tel/l__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>             <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>             <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ls</l>            <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>             <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>             <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>           <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>           <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>           <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="th/ink__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>           <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>           <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inks</l>          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ocht</l>          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ocht</l>          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inkin</l>         <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inkin</l>         <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inkin</l>         <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="thr/aw__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>           <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>           <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aws</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>           <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awn</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awin</l>         <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awin</l>         <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awin</l>         <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="spik">              <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ik__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spikk">             <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ikk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spit">              <i>spit</i><par n="spit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stan">              <i>staun</i><par n="st/aun__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="staund">            <i>staund</i><par n="st/aund__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tak">               <i>t</i><par n="t/ak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="take">              <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tell">              <i>tel</i><par n="tel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="think">             <i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="thraw">             <i>thr</i><par n="thr/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unnerstaun">        <i>unnerst</i><par n="st/aun__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unnerstaund">       <i>unnerst</i><par n="st/aund__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spell">            <i>spel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
